Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Fire Department Aid

17.210.
Purpose of KRS 17.210 to 17.270.

In enacting a fire department aid law it is the intention of the General Assembly to supplement local efforts to prevent the loss of lives and property by fire. The inadequacy of present facilities, the high cost of acquisition and maintenance of modern firefighting equipment and the need for better trained firefighters are hereby declared to be matters of public interest and concern and vital to the promotion of the health, safety, prosperity and security of the inhabitants of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 93, § 1; 1978, ch. 164, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The purpose of a fire protection district is to prevent the loss of lives and property by fire; expenditures that fit within the following categories, or that are indispensable to carrying out the objects included in these categories, are expenditures for the establishment, maintenance, and operation of a fire protection district: 1. Acquisition and maintenance of adequate fire protection facilities; 2. Acquisition and maintenance of adequate fire fighting equipment; 3. Recruitment, training, and supervision of firefighters; 4. Control and extinguishment of fires; 5. Prevention of fires; 6. Conducting fire safety activities; 7. Payment of compensation to firefighters and necessary support and supervisory personnel.

OAG 90-145

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Fire prevention and protection, KRS

227.200

to

227.992

.

17.220.
Fire Department Committee. [Repealed.]

17.230.
Appointment of committee members. [Repealed.]

17.240.
Terms of committee members. [Repealed.]

17.250.
Volunteer fire department aid fund established — Allotment of funds accruing from insurance premium surcharge proceeds — Reimbursement for equipment losses — Firefighters training center fund established — Application for funding. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

17.260.
Expenditure of allotted funds. [Repealed.]

17.270.
List of approved expenditures. [Repealed.]